Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Public Accountancy.

Sec. 08.04.005.
Purpose.

It is the policy of the state and the purpose of this chapter to promote the reliability of information that is used for guidance in financial transactions or assessing the financial status or performance of commercial, noncommercial, and governmental enterprises. The public interest requires that

persons professing special competence in accountancy or who offer assurance as to the reliability or fairness of presentation of financial information should demonstrate their qualifications to do so, and that persons who have not demonstrated and maintained adequate qualifications should not be permitted to hold themselves out as having special competence or to offer assurance about their actions;

the professional conduct of persons licensed as having special competence in accountancy should be regulated in all aspects of the practice of public accounting;

a public authority competent to prescribe and assess the qualifications and to regulate the professional conduct of practitioners of public accounting should be established; and

the use of titles relating to the practice of public accounting that are likely to mislead the public as to the status or competence of the persons using these titles should be prohibited.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Sec. 08.04.010.
Creation of board.

There is created the Board of Public Accountancy.

History.

(§ 2(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.04.020.
Appointment and qualifications of board.

The board consists of seven members appointed by the governor. Each member shall be a resident of this state for at least one year. Five members shall be certified public accountants or public accountants and two members shall be public members.

Except for public members, an individual may not be appointed unless the individual holds a current license. Public members may not be employed by a person holding a license, permit, out-of-state exemption, or practice privilege under this chapter. Notwithstanding AS

08.01.025

, an accountant who does not hold a license under this chapter and is not engaged in the practice of public accounting in violation of this chapter is eligible for appointment as a public member under this section.

History.

(§ 2(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 258 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (b), deleted “out-of-state exemption” following “license, permit,” inserted “, and does not have a direct financial interest in public accounting” following “violation of this chapter”, and made related changes.

Cross references. —

For term of office, see AS

08.01.035

.

For transitional provision relating to the members of the Board of Public Accountancy who are in office on January 1, 2008, see § 56, ch. 16, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 08.04.020.
Appointment and qualifications of board.

The board consists of seven members appointed by the governor. Each member shall be a resident of this state for at least one year. Five members shall be certified public accountants or public accountants and two members shall be public members.

Except for public members, an individual may not be appointed unless the individual holds a current license. Public members may not be employed by a person holding a license, permit, or practice privilege under this chapter. Notwithstanding AS

08.01.025

, an accountant who does not hold a license under this chapter, is not engaged in the practice of public accounting in violation of this chapter, and does not have a direct financial interest in public accounting is eligible for appointment as a public member under this section.

History.

(§ 2(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 258 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.025.
Meetings of board.

The board shall hold a minimum of four meetings a year.

History.

(§ 4 ch 62 SLA 1991)

Sec. 08.04.030.
Removal of members.

The governor shall remove any member of the board whose license has been revoked or suspended. The governor may, after hearing, remove any member for neglect of duty or other just cause.

History.

(§ 2(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

See also AS

08.01.020

and

08.01.035

.

Sec. 08.04.040.
Vacancy on board.

A vacancy shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term, except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), and all vacancies shall be filled within 60 days. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), after the expiration of a member’s term of office a member continues to serve until a successor is appointed and qualifies, formally advises the board of acceptance of the appointment, and appears at the next meeting of the board.

History.

(§ 2(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

See also AS

08.01.035

.

Sec. 08.04.050.
Quorum.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.

(§ 2(3) ch 187 SLA 1960)

Sec. 08.04.055.
Executive secretary of board.

The department, in consultation with the board, shall employ a certified public accountant or person who has other accounting experience satisfactory to the board and who is not a member of the board to serve as executive secretary of the board.

The executive secretary shall perform duties as prescribed by the board.

The executive secretary of the board is in the partially exempt service and entitled to receive a monthly salary equal to a step in Range 23 on the salary schedule set out in AS

39.27.011(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2011)

Sec. 08.04.060.
Employment of personnel. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.04.070.
Functions of board.

The board shall elect annually from its members a presiding officer, secretary, and treasurer. One person may hold the offices of secretary and treasurer.

The board may adopt and amend regulations for the orderly conduct of its affairs and for the administration of this chapter.

The board shall adopt a seal.

[Repealed, § 53 ch 16 SLA 2006.]

[Repealed, § 53 ch 16 SLA 2006.]

The board shall adopt a formal statement of goals, objectives, and policies to be reviewed and updated annually.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 19 SLA 1998.]

The board shall define by regulation the qualifications and duties of the executive secretary and delegate authority to the executive secretary as necessary to conduct board business.

History.

(§ 2(3) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 53 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 2010; am §§
11, 12 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For rules of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 4, art. 1.

For the board, see 12 AAC 4, art. 2.

For requirements for certificate or license, see 12 AAC 4, art. 3.

For examination, see 12 AAC 4, art. 4.

For certificates and licenses, see 12 AAC 4, art. 5.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 4, art. 6.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 4, art. 7.

For quality review, see 12 AAC 4, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, made stylistic changes in (a); in (f), inserted a comma following “objectives”.

Sec. 08.04.075.
Substantial equivalency.

The board shall determine whether the education, examination, and experience qualifications of another state or an individual are substantially equivalent to the national standard or to another standard established by the board to protect the public interest. The board may adopt by regulation the qualifications established by a nationally recognized professional organization for accountants as the national standard or for another standard established by the board to protect the public interest. The board may accept the determination of a nationally recognized professional organization for accountants or adopt another standard as to whether the qualifications of the other state or an individual are substantially equivalent to the national standard. When ascertaining substantial equivalency under this chapter, the order in which education, examination, or experience requirements were attained shall be disregarded.

History.

(§ 5 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For certificates and licenses, see 12 AAC 4, art. 5.

Sec. 08.04.080.
Adoption of rules.

The board may adopt rules of professional conduct to establish and maintain a high standard of integrity and dignity in the profession of public accounting. At least 30 days before the adoption of any rule or amendment, the board shall send a notice of the proposed rule or amendment to each holder of a license or permit issued under this chapter to the address of the license or permit holder last known to the board.

History.

(§ 2(5) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For rules of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 4, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 15, 2014, substituted “30 days” for “60 days” near the beginning of the second sentence.

The 2018 amendment, effective October 31, 2018, in the second sentence, substituted “send a notice” for “mail copies” following “the board shall”, and deleted “together with a notice of its effective date” following “proposed rule or amendment”.

Sec. 08.04.085.
Regulations regarding attest functions. [Repealed, § 42 ch 67 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 08.04.090.
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act. [Repealed, § 15 ch 82 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.01.090.]